Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1309
Records; release; when.

Upon the request of the office or designated local board, any records pertaining to a case assigned to such local board shall be furnished to the office or designated local board by the Department of Health and Human Services, by any public official or employee of a political subdivision having relevant contact with the child, or, upon court order, by the Office of Probation Administration. Upon the request of the Foster Care Review Office or designated local board, and if such information is not obtainable elsewhere, the court having jurisdiction of the foster child shall release such information to the office or designated local board as the court deems necessary to determine the physical, psychological, and sociological circumstances of such foster child.

Laws 1982, LB 714, § 9;

Laws 1990, LB 1222, § 8;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 197;

Laws 2012, LB998, § 10;

Laws 2015, LB265, § 12.